District of Columbia statutes.
11-1102

Use of alternative dispute resolution.

To the greatest extent practicable and safe, cases and proceedings in the Family Court of the Superior Court shall be resolved through alternative dispute resolution procedures, in accordance with such rules as the Superior Court may promulgate.

History

Jan. 8, 2002, 115 Stat. 2100, Pub. L. 107-114, § 4(a)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 11-1106.